Missouri, session 2026, HB2215.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 143, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 143.135, to read as follows:
143.135. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Deduction", an amount subtracted from a taxpayer's Missouri adjusted
gross income to determine the taxpayer's Missouri taxable income for a given tax year;
(2) "Qualified amount", for any qualified taxpayer in a given tax year, an
amount equal to one hundred percent of all Missouri tangible personal property taxes
actually paid by the qualified taxpayer in a given tax year on all tangible personal
property taxes owed by the taxpayer, exclusive of special assessments, penalties, interest,
charges, fees, or other additional amounts. Only the amounts of such personal property
taxes actually paid by the taxpayer shall qualify for the deduction and only if such
amounts are paid during the tax year for which this deduction is claimed;
(3) "Qualified taxpayer", any individual with an income tax liability under
chapter 143, excluding the withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, who
accrued tangible personal property taxes and actually paid such taxes.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, in addition to all other
deductions and modifications allowed by law, a qualified taxpayer shall be allowed a
deduction from the taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income in an amount equal to
the taxpayer's qualified amount or the taxpayer may elect to take such amount as an
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2215 2
itemized deduction on his or her state income tax return. No deduction shall be claimed
under this section for the amount of tangible personal property tax that has been or is
used in obtaining a state tax credit, exemption, subtraction, or a different deduction.
3. The department of revenue shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section including, but not limited to, rules
relating to the verification of a taxpayer's qualified amount. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
✔